Tennessee, session 114, SB1977.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-311, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(h) Notwithstanding this section or another law to the contrary, if the trial judge
finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant has violated conditions of
probation and suspension of sentence for a felony offense by engaging in conduct that
constitutes a drug offense under title 39, chapter 17, part 4, then for the first instance of
such a violation of conditions of probation and suspension of sentence, the trial judge
shall order the defendant to attend a substance abuse treatment program and shall not
revoke the defendant's probation and suspension of sentence.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1977
009856
- 1 -